Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-216
Consumer telephone call, defined.

Consumer telephone call means a telephone call made by a seller for the purpose of soliciting a sale of any consumer goods or services to the person called, for the purpose of soliciting an extension of credit for consumer goods or services to the person called, or for the purpose of obtaining information that may be used for the direct solicitation of a sale of consumer goods or services to the person called or an extension of credit for such purposes.

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 78.